Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2704.70
Feminine hygiene products; exemption.

(1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, storage, use, or other consumption in this state of feminine hygiene products.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Feminine hygiene products means tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle but does not include grooming and hygiene products; and

(b) Grooming and hygiene products means soaps and cleaning solutions, shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan lotions and screens, regardless of whether the items meet the definition of over-the-counter drug in section 77-2704.09.

Laws 2022, LB984, § 6.